src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON a1_pitka
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pitkä:pit
+A:tkä x1 ; 
+A+Sg+Nom: R ; 
+A+Sg+Gen:^WG%>n R ;
+A+Pl+Gen:tkien K ;
+A+Comp:te 3comp ; 
+A+Comp+Sg+Nom:te^WG%>mpi K ;
+A+Comp+Sg+Ess:tempänä K ;
+A+Comp+Pl+Ess:tempinä K ;
+A+Comp+Pl+Gen:tempien K ;

+A+Superl+Sg+Nom:sin K ; 
+A+Superl+Sg+Nom:ssiin K ; 
+A+Superl+Sg+Gen:simän K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Gen:ssiimän K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Par:sim%>ästä K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Par:ssiim%>ästä K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ill:simp%>hään K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ill:ssiimp%>hään K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ine:simässä K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ine:ssiimässä K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ela:simästä K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ela:ssiimästä K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Abl:simältä K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Abl:ssiimältä K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+All:simälle K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+All:ssiimälle K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ade:simällä K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ade:ssiimällä K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ess:simpännä K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ess:ssiimpännä K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ess:simpänä K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ess:ssiimpänä K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Tra:simäksi K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Tra:ssiimäksi K ;

+A+Superl+Pl+Nom:sim%>ät K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Nom:ssiim%>ät K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Gen:simpien K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Gen:ssiimpien K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Gen:simitten K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Gen:ssiimitten K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Par:simpiä K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Par:ssiimpiä K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Tra:simiksi K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Tra:ssiimiksi K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ill:simphiin K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ill:ssiimphiin K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ine:simissä K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ine:ssiimissä K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ela:simistä K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ela:ssiimistä K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+All:ssiimille K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+All:simille K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+All:ssiimille K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ade:simillä K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ade:ssiimillä K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Abl:similtä K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Abl:ssiimiltä K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ess:simpinnä K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ess:ssiimpinnä K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ess:simpinä K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ess:ssiimpinä K ;

LEXICON a_ma
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** adding **+A** and sending to **x1**, and to *3comp, 3sup*.
+A+Sg+Nom:^WGn R ; 
+A+Sg+Gen:%>m^An R ;  
+A+Sg+Nom:%>n K ; 
+A+Sg+Gen:%>m^An K ; 
+A+Sg+Par:^WG%>nt^A K ; 
+A+Sg+Ill:%>mph^A^An K ;  
+A+Sg+Ine:%>m^Ass^A K ;       
+A+Sg+Ela:%>m^Ast^A K ;       
+A+Sg+All:%>m^Alle K ;       
+A+Sg+Ade:%>m^All^A K ;      
+A+Sg+Abl:%>m^Alt^A K ;       
+A+Sg+Tra:%>m^Aksi K ;        
+A+Sg+Ess:%>mp^An^A K ; !CHECK
+A+Sg+Ess:%>mp^Ann^A K ;        
+A+Sg+Abe:%>m^Att^A K ;      

+A+Pl+Nom:%>m^At K ;
+A+Pl+Gen:%>mitten K ;
+A+Pl+Gen:%>nten K ;
+A+Pl+Par:%>mpi2^A K ;
+A+Pl+Ill:%>mphiin K ;  
+A+Pl+Ine:%>mi2ss^A K ; 
+A+Pl+Ela:%>mi2st^A K ; 
+A+Pl+All:%>mi2lle K ;  
+A+Pl+Ade:%>mi2ll^A K ; 
+A+Pl+Abl:%>mi2lt^A K ; 
+A+Pl+Tra:%>mi2ksi K ;  
+A+Pl+Ess:%>mpi2nn^A K ; 
+A+Pl+Abe:%>mi2tt^A K ; 

+A+Comp: 3comp ;
+A+Comp+Sg+Nom:%>mpi K ;
+A+Comp+Sg+Ess:%>mp^An^A K ;!CHECK
+A+Comp+Pl+Gen:%>mpien K ; 
+A+Comp+Pl+Ess:%>mpin^A K ;
+A+Superl:mm^Ais 3sup ; 

LEXICON a_e
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** gets +A and goes to x_e.
+A: x_e ; !!≈ * @CODE@
+A+Comp+Sg+Nom:^WG%>mpi K ;
+A+Comp: 4comp ; !!≈ * @CODE@
+A+Superl:ime 4sup; !!≈ * @CODE@

LEXICON a3 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** kamala gets +A and points to x3
+A+Sg+Nom:^E2I R ;
+A+Sg+Gen:^WG%>n R ;
+A: x3_sg ; 
+A+Sg+Par+Err/Orth:%>t^A PxK ; !Kolla med Elina
+A+Pl+Nom:^WG%> t_PxK ;
+A+Pl+Gen:%>i9tte n_PxK ; 
+A+Pl+Gen:%>i9e n_PxK ;
+A+Pl+Par:%>i9t^A PxK ; 
+A+Pl+Par:%>i9^A PxK ; !31/7 tillägg, kolla EK
+A+Pl+Ill:^HMETA%>hii9 n_PxK ; !31/7 ändrat
+A+Pl+Ill:^HMET2%>hii9 n_PxK ;
+A+Pl+Ill:^HMETA%>h^Vi2shii n_PxK ; !Test 24/2
+A+Pl+Ine:^WG%>i9ss^A PxK ;
+A+Pl+Ela:^WG%>i9st^A PxK ;
+A+Pl+All:^WG%>i9lle PxK ; 
+A+Pl+Ade:^WG%>i9ll^A PxK ;
+A+Pl+Abl:^WG%>i9lt^A PxK ;
+A+Pl+Tra:%>i9 TRA ;
+A+Pl+Ess:%>i9n^A PxK ;
+A+Pl+Abe:%>i9tt^A PxK ;

+A+Comp: 4comp ;
+A+Comp+Sg+Nom:^WG%>mpi K ;
!FRÅN 4sup och xsup men extra m
+A+Superl+Sg+Nom:^WG%>i5n # ; 
+A+Superl+Sg+Gen:%>i5mm^An K ; 
+A+Superl+Sg+Par:%>i5mp^A^A K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Tra:%>i5mm^Aksi K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ill:%>i5mph^A^An K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ine:%>i5mm^Ass^A K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ela:%>i5mm^Ast^A K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Abl:%>i5mm^Alt^A K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+All:%>i5mm^Ale K ; 
+A+Superl+Sg+Ade:%>i5mm^Al^A K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ess:%>i5mp^An^A K ;

+A+Superl+Pl+Nom:%>i5mm^At # ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Gen:%>i5mmitten K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Par:%>i5mpi^A K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Tra:%>i5mmiksi K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ill:%>i5mphiin K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ine:%>i5mmiss^A K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ela:%>i5mmist^A K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Abl:%>i5mmilt^A K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ess:%>i5mpin^A K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+All:%>i5mmile K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ade:%>i5mmil^A K ;


 LEXICON a3_VV 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** like a3 except superlativ
+A+Sg+Nom:^E2I R ;
+A+Sg+Gen:^WG%>n R ;
+A: x3_sg ; 
+A+Sg+Par+Err/Orth:%>t^A PxK ; !Kolla med Elina
+A+Pl+Nom:^WG%> t_PxK ;
+A+Pl+Gen:%>i9tte n_PxK ; 
+A+Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:%>i9e n_PxK ;
+A+Pl+Par:%>i9t^A PxK ; 
+A+Pl+Ill:^HMETA%>h^Vi9 n_PxK ; 
+A+Pl+Ill:^HMET2%>h^Vi9 n_PxK ;
+A+Pl+Ill:^HMETA%>h^Vi2shii n_PxK ;
!+A+Pl+Ill:^HMETA%>hi2shii n_PxK ;
+A+Pl+Ine:^WG%>i9ss^A PxK ;
+A+Pl+Ela:^WG%>i9st^A PxK ;
+A+Pl+All:^WG%>i9le PxK ; 
+A+Pl+Ade:^WG%>i9l^A PxK ;
+A+Pl+Abl:^WG%>i9lt^A PxK ;
+A+Pl+Tra:%>i9 TRA ;
+A+Pl+Ess:%>i9n^A PxK ;
+A+Pl+Abe:%>i9tt^A PxK ;

+A+Comp: 4comp ;
+A+Comp+Sg+Nom:^WG%>mpi K ;

!FRÅN 4sup och xsup !CHECK bara hänvisa dit??
+A+Superl+Sg+Nom:^WG%>i5n # ; 
+A+Superl+Sg+Gen:%>i5m^An K ; 
+A+Superl+Sg+Par:%>i5mp^A^A K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Tra:%>i5m^Aksi K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ill:%>i5mph^A^An K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ine:%>i5m^Ass^A K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ela:%>i5m^Ast^A K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Abl:%>i5m^Alt^A K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+All:%>i5m^Alle K ; 
+A+Superl+Sg+Ade:%>i5m^Al^A K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ess:%>i5mp^Ann^A K ;

+A+Superl+Pl+Nom:%>i5m^At # ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Gen:%>i5mitten K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Par:%>i5mpi^A K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Tra:%>i5miksi K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ill:%>i5mphiin K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ine:%>i5miss^A K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ela:%>i5mist^A K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Abl:%>i5milt^A K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ess:%>i5mpinn^A K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+All:%>i5mille K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ade:%>i5mil^A K ;


LEXICON a4
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+A: x5_sg ; !ist f x4
+A: x5_pl ; !ist f x4
+A+Comp: 3comp ; 
+A+Comp+Sg+Nom:^WG%>mpi K ;
+A+Superl: 3sup ; 


LEXICON a5_nuori
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** ist för a5_moni?
a4 ;
+A+Pl+Gen:^E2I%>en PxK ; !nuorien 
+A+Pl+Gen:%>te n_PxK ; !nuorten
+A+Comp+Pl+Gen:mpie n_PxK ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Nom:^E2I%>i n_PxK ; !nuoriin
+A+Superl+Pl+Gen:^E2I%>mpie n_PxK ; !nuorimpien

LEXICON a_suuri
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** has no comparative or superlative , just points to x4
 :e a4 ; 
+A+Pl+Gen:%>ten K ;
+A+Comp+Pl+Gen:e%>mpien K ; !variant
+A+Comp+Sg+Ess:e%>mp^An^A K ; ! also suurempana
+A+Comp+Pl+Ess:e%>mpin^A K ; ! also suurempana
+A+Superl:i 3sup ; !extra i hela paradigmet
+A+Superl+Sg+Ess:%>i5mp^An^A K ; ! also suurimpina
+A+Superl+Sg+Ess:i%>i5mp^An^A K ; ! also suuriimpina
+A+Superl+Pl+Ess:%>i5mpin^A K ; ! also suurimpina
+A+Superl+Pl+Ess:i%>i5mpin^A K ; ! also suuriimpina
+A+Superl+Pl+Gen:%>i5mpien K ; ! also suurimpien
+A+Superl+Pl+Gen:i%>i5mpien K ; ! also suuriimpien
