src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON AdjectiveRoot !!≈ @CODE@
pitkä:pi a1_pitka ;
muikea a3_VV ; 
moni:mone a5_nuori ;
krahea:krahea a3_VV ;
kuohea:kuohea a3_VV ;
kauhea:kauhea a3_VV ;
niuhea:niuhea a3_VV ;
tuuhea:tuuhea a3_VV ;
jaakea:jaakea a3_VV ;
makea:makea a3_VV ;
sakea:sakea a3_VV ;
rohkea:rohkea a3_VV ;
haikea:haikea a3_VV ;
vaikea:vaikea a3_VV ;
oikea:oikea a3_VV ;
huikea:huikea a3_VV ;
muikea:muikea a3_VV ;
alkea:alkea a3_VV ;
valkea:valkea a3_VV ;
puna-valkea:puna-valkea a3_VV ;
mustavalkea:mustavalkea a3_VV ;
fiilivalkea:fiilivalkea a3_VV ;
lumivalkea:lumivalkea a3_VV ;
sinivalkea:sinivalkea a3_VV ;
vitivalkea:vitivalkea a3_VV ;
maitovalkea:maitovalkea a3_VV ;
kankea:kankea a3_VV ;
kylmänkankea:kylmänkankea a3_VV ;
sokea:sokea a3_VV ;
puolisokea:puolisokea a3_VV ;
karkea:karkea a3_VV ;
korkea:korkea a3_VV ;
pilvenkorkea:pilvenkorkea a3_VV ;
surkea:surkea a3_VV ;
notkea:notkea a3_VV ;
aukea:aukea a3_VV ;
vaalea:vaalea a3_VV ;
hailea:hailea a3_VV ;
pullea:pullea a3_VV ;
kolea:kolea a3_VV ;
puulea:puulea a3_VV ;
kaamea:kaamea a3_VV ;
pramea:pramea a3_VV ;
samea:samea a3_VV ;
tahmea:tahmea a3_VV ;
laimea:laimea a3_VV ;
soimea:soimea a3_VV ;
komea:komea a3_VV ;
kumea:kumea a3_VV ;
ahnea:ahnea a3_VV ;
rapea:rapea a3_VV ;
kalpea:kalpea a3_VV ;
kuolemankalpea:kuolemankalpea a3_VV ;
nopea:nopea a3_VV ;
nuopea:nuopea a3_VV ;
korea:korea a3_VV ;
murea:murea a3_VV ;
nurea:nurea a3_VV ;
kalsea:kalsea a3_VV ;
lonsea:lonsea a3_VV ;
usea:usea a3_VV ;
kostea:kostea a3_VV ;
lattea:lattea a3_VV ;
kauhia:kauhia a3_VV ;
luononharmaja:luonon#harmaja a3 ;
harmoja:harmoja a3 ;
kimakka:kimakka a3 ;
kirrakka:kirrakka a3 ;
tohokka:tohokka a3 ;
kamala:kamala a3 ;
kavala:kavala a3 ;
nokkela:nokkela a3 ;
vilunpanema:vilun#panema a3 ;
ihana:ihana a3 ;
ainoa:ainoa a3_VV ;
halastu:halastu a3 ;
ankara:ankara a3 ;
hatara:hatara a3 ;
ahkera:ahkera a3 ;
kippura:kippura a3 ;
suivasa:suivasa a3 ;
lukuisa:lukuisa a3 ;
valosa:valosa a3 ;
kelposa:kelposa a3 ;
latosa:latosa a3 ;
ruttosa:ruttosa a3 ;
taipusa:taipusa a3 ;
joutusa:joutusa a3 ;
ainua:ainua a3_VV ;
keijaava:keijaava a3 ;
tilaava:tilaava a3 ;
huimaava:huimaava a3 ;
kelpaava:kelpaava a3 ;
seuraava:seuraava a3 ;
vahteava:vahteava a3 ;
tunkiolihava:tunkiolihava a3 ;
pauhava:pauhava a3 ;
järkivajava:järkivajava a3 ;
kirjava:kirjava a3 ;
vakava:vakava a3 ;
jalkava:jalkava a3 ;
palava:palava a3 ;
painava:painava a3 ;
maksava:maksava a3 ;
herratava:herratava a3 ;
pruunahtava:pruunahtava a3 ;
taitava:taitava a3 ;
valtava:valtava a3 ;
kantava:kantava a3 ;
juotava:juotava a3 ;
punertava:punertava a3 ;
haastava:haastava a3 ;
loistava:loistava a3 ;
polttava:polttava a3 ;
joutava:joutava a3 ;
jouheva:jouheva a3 ;
levvääpolkeva:levvääpolkeva a3 ;
koskeva:koskeva a3 ;
kaaleva:kaaleva a3 ;
pulleva:pulleva a3 ;
läsnäoleva:läsnä#oleva a3 ;
tuleva:tuleva a3 ;
sopeva:sopeva a3 ;
kaareva:kaareva a3 ;
haiseva:haiseva a3 ;
kärynhaiseva:kärynhaiseva a3 ;
puiseva:puiseva a3 ;
ylösnouseva:ylösnouseva a3 ;
vahteva:vahteva a3 ;
lanteva:lanteva a3 ;
tunteva:tunteva a3 ;
latteva:latteva a3 ;
sopiva:sopiva a3 ;
luukova:luukova a3 ;
pullova:pullova a3 ;
kiehuva:kiehuva a3 ;
puhuva:puhuva a3 ;
hehkuva:hehkuva a3 ;
liikkuva:liikkuva a3 ;
heiluva:heiluva a3 ;
ontuva:ontuva a3 ;
kätheentuntuva:kätheen#tuntuva a3 ;
verelemaistuva:verele#maistuva a3 ;
viime:viime a_e ;
ahne:ahne a_e ;
tiine:tiine a_e ;
luone:luone a_e ;
tyyne:tyyne a_e ;
tuore:tuore a_e ;
komeaperse:komea#perse a_e ;
terve:terve a_e ;
villi:ville a5_nuori ;
nuori:nuore a5_nuori ;
suuri:suur a_suuri ;
jättiläissuuri:jättiläis#suur a_suuri ;
vasen:vase a_ma ;
lähin:lähi a_ma ;
vähin:vähi a_ma ;
lämmin:lämpi a_ma ;
kropanlämmin:kropan#lämpi a_ma ;
keskikesänlämmin:keskikesän#lämpi a_ma ;
aurinkolämmin:aurinko#lämpi a_ma ;
tunkkulämmin:tunkku#lämpi a_ma ;
nisälämmin:nisä#lämpi a_ma ;
keheä:keheä a3_VV ;
tiheä:tiheä a3_VV ;
pöyheä:pöyheä a3_VV ;
käheä:käheä a3_VV ;
mäheä:mäheä a3_VV ;
kröheä:kröheä a3_VV ;
kiihkeä:kiihkeä a3_VV ;
kihkeä:kihkeä a3_VV ;
röyhkeä:röyhkeä a3_VV ;
räikeä:räikeä a3_VV ;
ilkeä:ilkeä a3_VV ;
tärkeä:tärkeä a3_VV ;
sitkeä:sitkeä a3_VV ;
viileä:viileä a3_VV ;
sileä:sileä a3_VV ;
jyleä:jyleä a3_VV ;
pehmeä:pehmeä a3_VV ;
turkinpehmeä:turkinpehmeä a3_VV ;
kimeä:kimeä a3_VV ;
säkkipimeä:säkkipimeä a3_VV ;
kevättalvenpimeä:kevättalvenpimeä a3_VV ;
kirmeä:kirmeä a3_VV ;
kipeä:kipeä a3_VV ;
hilpeä:hilpeä a3_VV ;
hempeä:hempeä a3_VV ;
vihreä:vihreä a3_VV ;
oliivinvihreä:oliivinvihreä a3_VV ;
vireä:vireä a3_VV ;
pyöreä:pyöreä a3_VV ;
penseä:penseä a3_VV ;
hierteä:hierteä a3_VV ;
litteä:litteä a3_VV ;
untuvankeveä:untuvankeveä a3_VV ;
leveä:leveä a3_VV ;
hirveä:hirveä a3_VV ;
mehevä:mehevä a3 ;
yhentekevä:yhen#tekevä a3 ;
lenkevä:lenkevä a3 ;
jykevä:jykevä a3 ;
kielevä:kielevä a3 ;
menevä:menevä a3 ;
viihnaanmenevä:viihnaan#menevä a3 ;
pierevä:pierevä a3 ;
töisevä:töisevä a3 ;
persevä:persevä a3 ;
kyntevä:kyntevä a3 ;
kätevä:kätevä a3 ;
tissivä:tissivä a3 ;
päälenäkyvä:pääle#näkyvä a3 ;
päilyvä:päilyvä a3 ;
pysyvä:pysyvä a3 ;
ikävä:ikävä a3 ;
heinävä:heinävä a3 ;
tietävä:tietävä a3 ;
pitävä:pitävä a3 ;
kiiltävä:kiiltävä a3 ;
viikonkestävä:viikonkestävä a3 ;
ihmisystävä:ihmisystävä a3 ;
täristyttävä:täristyttävä a3 ;
höyryävä:höyryävä a3 ;
ruskea:ruskea a3_VV ;
